Tennessee, session 114, SB1848.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 53-11-311(b)(1), is amended by
deleting subdivision (D) and substituting:
(D) Directly administered the buprenorphine mono or buprenorphine
without use of naloxone by a healthcare provider, acting within the healthcare
provider's scope of practice, for the treatment of substance use disorder pursuant
to a medical order or prescription order from a physician licensed under title 63,
chapter 6 or 9 or a healthcare provider identified in subdivision (c)(2). This
subdivision (b)(1)(D) does not permit buprenorphine mono or buprenorphine
without use of naloxone to be dispensed to a patient in a manner that would
permit it to be administered away from the premises on which it is dispensed.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 53-11-311(c)(2), is amended by
deleting subdivision (H) and substituting:
(H) Does not prescribe or dispense a mono product or buprenorphine without
naloxone, except to a pregnant woman, nursing mother, a patient with a documented
history of an adverse reaction or hypersensitivity, or when prescribing an injectable
mono product;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1848
011509
- 1 -